Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive
Executive Order No. 3-87
(No. 04-18) [Racial, Ethnic and Cultural Disparity Mitigation.

WHEREAS, Vermont and Vermonters have a rich history of celebrating freedom and diversity, including the abolition of slavery in 1777; activism in the abolitionist movement; recognition of same sex marriage; state recognition of Abenaki people; and protection
of undocumented immigrants from potentially overreaching federal enforcement by recent legislative action; and

WHEREAS, Vermont’s tradition of leadership in freedom and diversity is still a vibrant thread in the fabric of our State; and

WHEREAS, our national dialogue on many critically important issues has been reduced to angry, hateful social media posts, and the space for meaningful conversation and respectful disagreement has been diminished and appears to be shrinking; and

WHEREAS, Vermont must continue its rich tradition and commitment to civility and respect for others and to celebrating and honoring our differences; and

WHEREAS, Vermont seeks to achieve equality and equity and to create a culture in which racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities are openly acknowledged and addressed, and where no one person is more likely to experience society’s benefits or burdens
than any other person; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is committed to equal employment opportunity, fostering a culture of inclusion, devoting sufficient resources to reduce racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities across all systems of State government and implementing
an improved talent acquisition process to attract and hire a high performing, diverse workforce; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is committed to identifying racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities throughout State government systems and functions, and to eliminating them, as one of the state’s largest employers and as a provider of a variety
of essential services to the public at large; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont has demonstrated leadership and has achieved notable and laudable success in addressing racial and other disparities by engaging with community partners and through the work of Executive Branch agencies, departments, commissions
and councils, for example, the Department of Public Safety through its Fair and Impartial Policing Initiative; the Agency of Transportation through its Office of Civil Rights, the Agency of Education through partnerships with professional
associations in anti-bias efforts, and the Governor’s Workforce Equity and Diversity Council (GWEDC) in increasing minority representation in the state government workforce; and

WHEREAS, these achievements must serve as a model for all agencies and departments of State government upon which to build and promote racial, ethnic and cultural equity in State employment and in the provision of essential governmental services to all
Vermonters.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Philip B. Scott, by the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby issue the following directive to the Executive Branch to promote racial, ethnic and other cultural equity, equality and
equal opportunity in Vermont.

Establishment of Panel and Officer.

A.
There shall be created and established within the Executive Branch a Chief Racial Equity and Diversity Officer (“Officer”) and a Racial, Ethnic and Cultural Equity Advisory Panel (“Panel”) to identify and work
to eradicate systemic racism and racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities within State government.

B.
The Officer shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of qualified applicants to be nominated for the position by the Panel, after a recruitment process during which the Commissioner of the Department of Human
Resources, in consultation with the Panel, will establish qualifications and advertise the position for recruitment. The Secretary of Administration is hereby directed to review the existing pool of vacant opportunities for
exempt employees to create and fund this position.

C.
The Officer shall be a full-time exempt employee within the Agency of Administration, shall report to the Secretary of Administration and shall work with all Executive Branch agencies and departments to implement
a program of continuing coordination and improvement of activities in State government to combat systemic racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities, and to measure progress toward more fair and impartial governance. The
Officer shall:

Conduct and oversee a comprehensive organizational review to identify overt and implicit bias, systemic racism and racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities in the Executive Branch and to identify and inventory systems in place that engender such
disparities;

Manage and oversee the collection of race-based data across the Executive Branch to determine the nature and scope of racial discrimination within all Executive Branch State government systems;

Develop a model fairness and diversity policy, and review and make recommendations regarding the fairness and diversity policies held by all Executive Branch State government agencies and departments;

Collaborate with Executive Branch agencies, departments, boards, and commissions to gather relevant existing data and records necessary to carry out the purposes of this Executive Order, and to develop best practices for remediating systemic racial, ethnic
and other cultural disparities throughout the Executive Branch of State government;

Work with Executive Branch agencies and departments, and with the Chief Performance Officer, to develop performance targets and performance measures to evaluate results in improving systems. These performance measures shall be included in each agency’s
or department’s quarterly reports to the Officer, and the Officer shall include the performance targets and performance measures of each Executive Branch agency and department in an annual report to the Governor;

In consultation and coordination with the Department of Human Resources and agencies and departments, develop and conduct training programs for agencies and departments regarding the nature and scope of systemic racism, implicit bias and the institutionalized
nature thereof;

Periodically report to the Panel on the progress towards carrying out the duties established in this Executive Order; and

Evaluate existing State Executive Orders which are designed to address equity and diversity issues and recommend, for the Governor’s consideration, updates, modifications or sunset provisions.

D.
The Officer shall be the designated Executive Branch liaison to the Vermont Human Rights Commission and shall be available to the Judicial and Legislative branches of State government to assist, as requested
by those co-equal branches, with respect to all issues pertaining to systemic racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities.

E.
The Officer shall serve in an advisory role to the State Equal Employment Opportunity Officer and the GWEDC.

F.
Upon request, the Officer shall be made available to report to legislative committees on the process for developing a comprehensive organizational review for the identification of overt and implicit bias,
systemic racism and racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities in the Executive Branch, as set forth in Section I(C)(1) above.

G.
The Panel shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor in consultation Panel with the Chair of the Human Rights Commission, the Speaker of the House, the President of the Senate, the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court and the Secretary of Administration.

Panel Members shall be drawn from diverse backgrounds to represent the interests of ethnic and diverse communities throughout the State, shall have the skills and experience necessary to effectively and efficiently provide advice regarding the work of
the Officer described in Section I (C) of this Executive Order and, to the extent possible, represent geographically diverse areas of the State.

The term of each member shall be three years, except that the initial appointments shall be one one-year term, two two-year terms and two three-year terms. As terms of currently serving members expire, appointments of successors shall be in accord with
the provisions of this subsection. The members of the Panel shall elect a Chair.

H.
The Panel’s initial responsibilities and duties shall be to assist and advise the Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources to develop a comprehensive job description for the Chief Racial Equity
and Diversity Officer position. Thereafter, the Panel shall participate in the recruitment process by reviewing and interviewing applicants and nominating all well qualified candidates for consideration for appointment
by the Governor.

I.
Thereafter, the Panel shall meet as needed and at least semi-annually and be advisory to the Governor with respect to issues of systemic racial, ethnic and cultural disparities to ensure continuous progress
toward the elimination of such disparities.

J.
Each member of the Panel shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
.

Training.

All full-time Executive Branch gubernatorial appointees shall attend annual State-sponsored training on issues related to racial equity and diversity.

Recruitment.

The State will recruit, retain, and develop a highly qualified and diverse workforce and membership on State Boards and Commissions. Recruitment procedures shall be in place to attract a diverse pool of applicants to all occupational categories. All personnel
involved in the recruiting, screening, and selection processes shall be properly trained to ensure the elimination and absence of bias in all recruitment activities.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until further order by the Governor or June 30, 2024, whichever is earlier.

Dated May 30, 2018.

Executive Order No. 3-88
(No. 03-19) [Justice Reinvestment II Working Group.

WHEREAS, Vermont has a history of implementing innovative and effective policy interventions and evidence-based practices and programs to improve public safety and public health outcomes; and

WHEREAS, between 2007 and 2008, the Council of State Governments Justice Center (CSG), worked with Vermont state leaders to analyze Vermont’s criminal justice data, interview stakeholders across the criminal justice system, and develop data-driven policy
options designed to reduce corrections spending and increase public safety which resulted in 2008 justice reinvestment legislation which improved screening and assessment for behavioral health treatment needs, increased access to community-based
substance use treatment programs, focused supervision resources on individuals most likely to reoffend and expanded transitional housing opportunities and job training programs (“Justice Reinvestment I); and

WHEREAS, Justice Reinvestment I successfully reversed upward pressure on the prison population which, in 2007 was projected to increase 23% by 2018, so that it actually fell 7% between Fiscal Year 2007 and Fiscal Year 2015; and

WHEREAS, resources in our criminal justice system must continue to be deployed to combat crimes in our communities, but we must also thoughtfully evaluate whether we are effectively investing in strategies that break the cycle of crime and incarceration;
and

WHEREAS, to better identify, analyze, and address challenges in Vermont-particularly those that lie at the intersection of the opioid crisis and criminal justice-Vermont state leaders have elected to form a working group and seek support from the U.S.
Department of Justice’s Bureau of Justice Assistance and The Pew Charitable Trusts to gather data, evaluate processes and programs, and make recommendations on policies designed to most efficiently allocate resources while keeping
the public safe, thus freeing up funds for reinvestment in strategies that improve public safety and public welfare; and

WHEREAS, this working group will bring state leaders, agencies and interested parties from across our criminal justice and behavioral health systems together to use data and best practices to inform policy changes and improvements.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Justice Reinvestment II Working Group, as follows:

Composition and Appointments

The Justice Reinvestment II Working Group shall consist of two members of the administration appointed by the Governor, the Defender General, or designee, the Attorney General, or designee, the Executive Director of States Attorneys and Sheriffs, or designee,
the Executive Director of Racial Equity, the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or designee, the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections or designee, the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health or
designee, the Commissioner of the Department of Health, or a designee with expertise in the public health effects of the opioid crisis in Vermont, a representative from the ACLU of Vermont and a representative from the Vermont
Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence. Further, the Governor shall invite the Speaker of the House to appoint two members of the House and the Senate Committee on Committees to appoint two members from the Senate.

The Governor shall invite the Chief Justice to serve as Chair of the Commission and appoint one other member of the Judiciary.

Justice Reinvestment II Working Group Charge and Process

The Justice Reinvestment II Working Group will assess the population trends and programming in the State’s corrections system and consider criminal justice reform strategies as part of the Justice Reinvestment II initiative with the overarching goals
of promoting safer, healthier communities and reducing costs.

The Justice Reinvestment II Working Group will work with the CSG to conduct a review of programming, transitional services and population trends in Vermont’s correctional facilities. The review may include an evaluation of the women’s corrections population
in Vermont and the programming and services to meet their needs, the detention population and barriers that exist to reducing the corrections population.

The CSG review shall include direct engagement and learning from interested parties statewide, including, but not limited to Vermonters for Criminal Justice Reform, Vermont Crime Victim Services, Vermont branches of the NAACP, Migrant Justice and the
Pride Center of Vermont.

All departments, offices, boards and agencies of the State shall provide assistance and cooperation to the Working Group and the CSG which may be necessary to fulfill the purposes of this Executive Order.

On or before December 1, 2019, the Justice Reinvestment II Working Group report on the data collected, options developed and analyzed and recommendations for policy changes.

Expense Reimbursement

I hereby authorize per diem compensation and reasonable and necessary expense reimbursement for travel and food for members who are not full-time State employees pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Date

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated July 9, 2019.

Executive Order No. 3-89
(No. 09-19) [Vermont 2020 Complete Count Committee.

WHEREAS, Article I, Section 2 of the United States Constitution requires the federal government to undertake a census every 10 years; and

WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 141 of Title 13 of the United States Code, the next federal census will be on April 1, 2020; and

WHEREAS, having a complete and accurate count of Vermont’s population is essential for the fair representation of the citizenry in the U.S. Congress, the State of Vermont legislature and the legislative bodies of local government; and

WHEREAS, the results of the census are the foundation for many important decisions made by federal and state government, including the disbursement of billions of dollars of federal funds to states based on population; and

WHEREAS, the U.S. Census Bureau identifies particular groups of residents as “hard-to-count” populations that have traditionally been undercounted in the decennial census process, including but not limited to:

• young children;

• highly mobile persons;

• racial and ethnic minorities;

• non-English speakers;

• low income persons;

• persons experiencing homelessness;

• undocumented immigrants;

• persons who distrust the government;

• LGBTQ persons;

• persons with mental or physical disabilities;

• persons who do not live in traditional housing; and

WHEREAS, it is critically important that census outreach and education efforts focus on reaching these hard-to-count populations to ensure the results of the 2020 Census are as accurate as possible; and

WHEREAS, it will take the collaboration of community leaders, non-profit organizations, local government, legislative leaders and the Governor of the State of Vermont to raise public awareness of the importance of the 2020 Census and to find ways to support
census data-collection efforts; and

WHEREAS, the U.S. Census Bureau recommends each state create a State Complete Count Committee with the goals of heightening awareness about the 2020 Census and encouraging residents to participate.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order and direct the creation of the “Vermont 2020 Complete Count Committee” which shall be constituted as set
forth below:

Composition and Appointments.

The Vermont 2020 Complete Count Committee shall consist of not more than 30 members to be appointed by the Governor. Governmental members shall include:

Secretary of the Agency of Administration, or designee;

Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, or designee;

Secretary of the Agency of Digital Services or designee;

Secretary of the Agency of Education, or designee;

Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, or designee;

Secretary of the Agency of Human Services, or designee;

Commissioner of the Department for Children and Families, or designee;

Commissioner of the Department of Health, or designee;

Commissioner of the Department of Labor, or designee;

Vermont State Data Center Coordinator;

Vermont Secretary of State, or designee;

With the consent of the Vermont Senate, no more than two members to be appointed by the Committee on Committees;

With the consent of the Vermont House of Representatives, no more than two members to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and

The remaining appointments to the Committee shall be broadly representative of the following sectors:

1.
Municipal government, including at least one community with low interest access;

2.
Community Action Agencies;

3.
Minority, immigrant and refugee communities;

4.
Homeless shelter providers;

5.
Youth-focused or child advocacy organizations;

6.
Education;

7.
Senior citizens;

8.
The LGBTQ community;

9.
Charitable foundations, community foundations, or faith-based organizations;

10.
The health care community;

11.
Local business and economic development; and

12.
Media/public relations.

In making appointments, the Governor shall make efforts to ensure diverse geographic, cultural, ethnic and gender representation on the Committee.

Charge.

The Committee shall identify barriers that may impede the full participation of Vermonters in the 2020 Census and shall develop, recommend and assist in the administration of an outreach action plan designed to overcome these barriers and to ensure as
complete a count as possible of Vermont’s population in the 2020 Census.

The census outreach strategy shall include, but not be limited to, state agency initiatives to encourage participation in the 2020 Census, the establishment and support of school-based outreach programs, partnerships with non-profit community-based organizations,
and a multi-lingual, multi-media campaign designed to ensure an accurate and complete count of Vermont’s population.

The Committee shall collaborate and coordinate with the United States Bureau of the Census and any other groups in the State needed to carry out Vermont’s outreach strategy.

The Committee shall endeavor to provide resources and referrals to people in the “hard-to-count” groups, such as housing placement opportunities for persons experiencing homelessness and access to legal resources for undocumented immigrants.

The first meeting of the Committee shall occur no later than the first week of December 2019.

Process.

The Chair of the Committee shall be appointed by the Governor.

The Committee shall meet at the call of its Chair.

The Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall provide administrative support to the Committee.

To assist in carrying out its duties, the Committee may create and appoint subcommittees as it deems appropriate and shall solicit participation from relevant experts and practitioners involved in census issues.

Members of the Committee shall serve terms that expire December 31, 2020. Vacancies in the committee shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment. All departments and agencies of the state government shall furnish such advice and information,
documentary and otherwise, to the Committee and its agents deemed necessary or desirable by the Committee to facilitate the purposes of this Executive Order.

Expense Reimbursement.

I hereby authorize per diem compensation and reasonable and necessary expense reimbursement for members who are not full-time State employees pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Date This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall expire on December 31, 2020.

Dated November 14, 2019

Executive Order No. 3-90
(No. 10-19) [Transfer of Property in Plymouth from BGS to Division for Historic Preservation.

WHEREAS, certain State-owned land located in the Town of Plymouth, County of Windsor (the “Property”), very near to one of Vermont’s premiere historic sites, the birthplace, boyhood home and site of Calvin Coolidge’s swearing in as 30th president of the
United States, is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services (“BGS”); and

WHEREAS, in 2006, BGS and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, Division for Historic Preservation (“DHP”), arranged for the installation of underground water storage tanks on the Property which are connected to water mains that lead to ten
of the historic site buildings; and

WHEREAS, this work facilitated the installation of the sprinkler system in the Museum & Education Center, the most visited museum owned by the State and the State’s only presidential archive; and

WHEREAS, the DHP desires the use of the Property for the maintenance and control of the water tanks and the preservation of the viewshed from the historic site.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to DHP for its purposes, from the jurisdiction and control of BGS, the following land and
premises, to wit:

Being all the lands and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following:

Being all and the same lands and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by deed of Carol Jean Hoskison dated August 18, 2006 and recorded in Volume 102, Page 104 of the Plymouth Land Records. Said lands and premises are described in said deed as follows:

“A portion of the same land and premises deeded to James E. and Vivian N. Blanchard by Edna A. Blanchard by Warranty deed dated September 29, 1945, and recorded in Vol. 25, page 165 of Plymouth Land Records. Said portion of said land herein conveyed is
described as follows:

‘Beginning at the southeast corner of land of Azro Johnson on the northerly side of the highway leading from the Coolidge homestead to Azro Johnson’s, said corner being the southwesterly corner of the parcel of land herein conveyed; thence northerly along
a stone wall and bounded westerly by land of Azro Johnson, approximately 460 feet to a corner, a granite post in the ground; thence generally southeasterly in a straight line approximately 500 feet to a corner, a granite post in the
ground; thence southerly in a straight line a distance of approximately 300 feet to a corner on the northerly edge of the aforesaid highway, a granite post in the ground; thence westerly along the northerly edge of said highway approximately
445 feet to the point of beginning.

‘There is also conveyed to the herein grantees, their heirs and assigns, a right of way of sufficient width for vehicles, from the aforesaid highway, across other land of the herein grantors near to the parcel of land herein conveyed near the southeast
corner of said parcel.

‘Reserving and excepting, however, by the herein grantors, their heirs and assigns a right of way of sufficient width for vehicles, across the parcel of land herein conveyed from the aforesaid highway to the sugar lot premises of the herein grantors which
lie northerly of the parcel of land herein conveyed.

‘Reference is had to the aforesaid deed, the deed therein referred to and records thereof, and said Land Records of Plymouth for a more particular description.

‘Reference is also had to a quit claim deed from Charles H. Hoskison and Eliza M. Hoskison to the Carol Jean Hoskison, whereby Charles H. Hoskison and Eliza M. Hoskison conveyed, by quit claim deed, their 2/3 interest in the land to Carol Jean Hoskison.
Said quit claim deed is dated and recorded March 17, 1980 in Volume 40, Page 8 of the Plymouth Land Records.”

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated December 3, 2019

Executive Order No. 3-91
(No. 02-20) [Racial Equity Task Force.

AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 02-20

WHEREAS, with the promulgation of Executive Order No. 04-18, codified as Executive Order No. 3-87, Governor Philip B. Scott clearly articulated a goal of having a more diverse and welcoming state; and

WHEREAS, Vermont must create a culture in which racial, ethnic and other cultural disparities are openly acknowledged and addressed; and

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont has demonstrated leadership in this regard through the creation of a Racial Equity Advisory Panel and the hiring of the Executive Director of Racial Equity; and

WHEREAS, the State must and will continue to address the challenges of achieving racial, ethnic and cultural equity across the State; and

WHEREAS, the COVID-19 pandemic has highlighted racial inequities across the United States, including in Vermont. COVID-19 and other emergencies demonstrate that disparities in times of crisis are reflective of disparities in times of prosperity, and that
we must actively work to reduce structural inequities to ensure that no community is more vulnerable than another based on immutable factors such as race or ethnicity; and

WHEREAS, we must bring state leaders, agencies and interested parties together from across Vermont to examine existing law on hate crimes, evaluate systems of support and look to increase civic participation among racially diverse populations.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby create the Governor’s Racial Equity Task Force, as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Governor’s Racial Equity Task Force may consist of up to ten members or approved alternates, including:

the Executive Director of Racial Equity who shall be Chair;

one member representing the Governor’s Office, appointed by the Governor;

one member of the public, appointed by the Governor from among three individuals recommended by the Task Force;

one member from the law enforcement community, appointed by the Governor;

one member representing the Vermont chapters of the NAACP, appointed by the Governor;

one member from the Vermont Commission on Native American Affairs, appointed by the Governor;

one member representing the Vermont ACLU, appointed by the Governor; and

the Executive Director of the Human Rights Commission.

The Task Force may, in its discretion, consult with any agency or department, or private sector professionals, outside of the Task Force for information and advice. The Executive Director of Racial Equity shall consult with the Racial Equity Advisory
Panel prior to finalizing Task Force recommendations.

Charge and Process.

The Task Force is hereby ordered to undertake the following three projects in the following order of priority:

Evaluate structures of support for racially diverse populations, particularly in light of the disparities in health outcomes highlighted by COVID-19:

a.
Structures that currently exist in Vermont;

b.
Models that have succeeded in other jurisdictions;

c.
Policy changes Vermont should consider or efforts the state can promote;

d.
Tools the state can provide to communities;

e.
Language access; and

f.
Economics, housing, healthcare and access to credit.

Review current state and federal law on hate speech and freedom of speech and consider:

a.
Changes to state law that would facilitate prosecuting harassment, hate speech and other bias-motivated crimes; and

b.
Changes to State law necessary to ban Confederate flags or other similarly incendiary flags/images from being displayed in places that receive state funding. If all such proposed changes are determined
by the Task Force to be highly likely to be found by a state or federal court to unconstitutionally restrict speech, after consultation with experts in constitutional law, the Task Force shall identify the entity most
appropriate to conduct training and education in this regard.

Study and present options for encouraging Vermonters from diverse, marginalized, or underrepresented racial and ethnic groups to run and serve in public office at all levels (local, state, including boards and commissions and federal). The Task Force
shall determine:

a.
Who, or what, organization(s) should conduct the training;

b.
Whether there is grant funding available to support this effort; and

c.
Whether there is a program in Vermont or elsewhere that could be replicated.

The Task Force shall be advisory to the Governor and make recommendations on the first Project by August 15, 2020. The Task Force shall also provide advice as needed by the Governor. Preliminary recommendations on Projects 2 and 3 shall be submitted to
the Governor by December 15, 2020.

The Task Force shall meet as needed and at least monthly. Meetings of the Task Force will be public and shall be held electronically for the duration of the COVID-19-related state of emergency and for so long thereafter as the Task Force deems practicable.
The Task Force shall ensure notice of the meetings is received in different geographic regions of the State in order to encourage public participation.

The Task Force shall receive administrative and staff support from the Office of the Governor and the Agency of Administration.

To the extent funding is available, each member of the Panel shall be entitled to per diem compensation pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until May 31, 2021 unless extended by the Governor.

Dated June 1, 2020.

Executive Order No. 3-92
(No. 01-21) [Creation of the Agency of Public Safety.

Revoked and rescinded by Addendum to Executive Order No. 01-21, dated April 14, 2021.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-21

[Recission of Executive Order]

WHEREAS, the Governor has the power under 3 V.S.A. chapter 41 to alter the organization of the Executive Branch through use of the Executive Order; and

WHEREAS, Governors have used the Executive Order over the years for a variety of purposes, including the creation of certain boards, councils and commissions and the reorganization of the Executive Branch; and

WHEREAS, Executive Order 01-21 (Creation of the Agency of Public Safety), is no longer necessary due to legislative action in this area.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby revoke and rescind Executive Order 01-21 dated January 14, 2021 (Creation of the Agency of Public Safety).

This Addendum to Executive Order 01-21 shall take effect upon execution.

Dated April 14, 2021.

Executive Order No. 3-93 Terminates by its own terms at midnight, December 31, 2023, unless extended by the Governor. (No. 04-21) [Permitting Modernization Directive.

WHEREAS, Vermonters deserve a modern government providing efficient and effective services, including exemplary customer service and reasonable expectations; and

WHEREAS, the work of the Governor’s Cabinet over the last four years has highlighted the fact that Vermont’s diversity of statutes, rules and regulatory programs to encourage economic growth, improve our roadways, facilitate the work of our farmers in
times of increasing economic stress, develop our outdoor recreation infrastructure and protect our natural resources, environment and public health often require complex and overlapping permitting and approval processes in an environment
of highly politicized competing policy and resource demands; and

WHEREAS, coordinated support for both existing enterprises and new and expanded commercial opportunities are critical to Vermont’s economic prosperity and workforce growth needed to sustain educational and health and human services for Vermont’s most
vulnerable; and

WHEREAS, it is unfortunate many perceive our system of permitting and approvals to be so cumbersome, complex, time-consuming and expensive they would rather risk non-compliance; and

WHEREAS, key to the support needed by Vermonters are permitting and approval processes that are rational and navigable; and

WHEREAS, optimizing total permitting time, modernizing and coordinating permitting processes and better utilizing technology to improve both oversight and efficiency, will benefit both Vermonters and Vermont’s environment; and

WHEREAS, continuously improving programs and processes is important, and ensuring that staff have the knowledge and skills to be able to do so effectively is crucial to meeting the ever-changing needs of Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, it is essential my Cabinet members use the continuous improvement skills we have developed to ensure greater collaboration and coordination across programs, departments and agencies to improve the customer experience of Vermonters while securing
the environmental outcomes required in law and rule.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby direct as follows:

Permitting Modernization Plan:

A.
The following Cabinet members shall work together to develop an implementable plan for an effective, Vermonter-focused land use permitting system designed to improve customer experience while securing environmental
outcomes required in law and rule (“Permitting Modernization Plan”). This Commission shall be advisory to the Governor. The development of the Permitting Modernization Plan shall ensure a robust public participation process:

Agency of Agriculture, Foods and Markets;

Agency of Commerce and Community Development;

Agency of Digital Services;

Agency of Natural Resources;

Agency of Transportation;

Department of Health;

Department of Public Safety; and

Natural Resources Board.

Meetings shall be chaired by the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development, or designee, who shall schedule regular meetings to be held at least monthly, and more frequently as needed. The first meeting shall be held by April 15, 2021.

The Secretary of the Agency of Digital Services shall designate a Project Manager and the Chief Performance Officer shall designate a facilitator to support this initiative. The Project Manager and Facilitator shall coordinate and guide the Permitting
Modernization Plan’s development process and record activities and decisions, using continuous improvement tools and methods appropriate for this task.

The assigned Cabinet members shall immediately establish a multi-disciplinary team (“MDT”) to provide increased coordination on existing projects triggering multiple permit jurisdictions. Members of the MDT shall immediately develop a charter for approval
by the Chair, acting on behalf of the Cabinet members. The MDT shall meet every week or as needed to streamline the permitting and approval processing for outstanding projects. The MDT shall be chaired by the lead representative
from the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. The MDT shall have the direct support of the Project Manager.

The Cabinet members shall ensure additional subject matter experts and resources are made available when deemed necessary by the Chair. The Chief Performance Officer and a liaison appointed by the Governor shall also support this work as necessary.

B.
The Permitting Modernization Plan shall be delivered to the Governor no later than May 31, 2021 and shall address, at a minimum:

1.
Key Performance Indicators (“KPI”) for the functioning of the permitting system, to include estimated total permitting time, and how those KPIs shall be made available to all Vermonters;

2.
The creation of a common entry system into the permitting process;

3.
The integration of existing and new permitting workflows into the Business Portal currently being upgraded by the Agencies of Commerce and Community Development and Digital Services together with the
Office of the Secretary of State;

4.
The development or procurement of a Customer Relationship Management (“CRM”) tool and how a CRM might be used in relationship to permitting interactions with the State of Vermont;

5.
An evaluation of current and needed communications tools, including the permitting handbook, websites, best practice guides, outreach to municipalities, and other steps that should be included in the
Permitting Modernization Plan;

6.
An assessment of current permitting staffing and existing volumes of applications to make any necessary recommended changes; and

7.
An evaluation of various state databases; how the data in each can more effectively communicate with another, and what changes are necessary.

C.
The Plan shall articulate all necessary short-, medium-, and long-term actions, create a timeline for achieving those steps, and recommend any immediate legislative action for steps which cannot otherwise
be performed under the existing authority of the Governor or an Executive Branch agency.

Reporting:

Updates on the KPIs and the status of the Permitting Modernization Plan implementation shall be reported to the Governor no less frequently than quarterly on each July 1, October 1, January 1 and April 1 of each year.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall terminate at midnight, December 31, 2023 unless extended by the Governor.

Dated March 5, 2021.